Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB906.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 604-B. Notice of financial information to resident taxpayers.Beginning with the financial information posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website under section 603-B(a) pertaining to the 2024-2025 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a public school entity shall provide a notice, via first class mail, of the financial information posted for the public school entity to each resident taxpayer.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617181920